Illinois, session 104th, HB3581.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by changing 5Section 8 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 505/8)  (from Ch. 120, par. 424)7    Sec. 8. Distribution of proceeds of tax. Except as 8provided in subsection (a-1) of this Section, Section 8a, 9subdivision (h)(1) of Section 12a, Section 13a.6, and items 1013, 14, 15, and 16 of Section 15, all money received by the 11Department under this Act, including payments made to the 12Department by member jurisdictions participating in the 13International Fuel Tax Agreement, shall be deposited into a 14special fund in the State treasury, to be known as the Motor 15Fuel Tax Fund, and shall be used as follows:16    (a) 2 1/2 cents per gallon of the tax collected on special 17fuel under paragraph (b) of Section 2 and Section 13a of this 18Act shall be transferred to the State Construction Account 19Fund in the State Treasury; the remainder of the tax collected 20on special fuel under paragraph (b) of Section 2 and Section 2113a of this Act shall be deposited into the Road Fund;22    (a-1) Beginning on July 1, 2019, an amount equal to the 23amount of tax collected under subsection (a) of Section 2 and   HB3581- 2 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1Section 13a as a result of the increase in the tax rate under 2subsection (a) of Section 2 authorized by Public Act 101-32 3shall be deposited each month into the Transportation Renewal 4Fund; provided, however, that the amount that represents the 5part (b) portion of the rate under Section 13a shall be 6deposited each month into the Motor Fuel Tax Fund and the 7Transportation Renewal Fund in the same proportion as the 8amount collected under subsection (a) of Section 2; 9    (b) $420,000 shall be transferred each month to the State 10Boating Act Fund to be used by the Department of Natural 11Resources for the purposes specified in Article X of the Boat 12Registration and Safety Act;13    (c) $3,500,000 shall be transferred each month to the 14Grade Crossing Protection Fund to be used as follows: not less 15than $12,000,000 each fiscal year shall be used for the 16construction or reconstruction of rail highway grade 17separation structures; $5,500,000 in fiscal year 2022 and each 18fiscal year thereafter shall be transferred to the 19Transportation Regulatory Fund and shall be used to pay the 20cost of administration of the Illinois Commerce Commission's 21railroad safety program in connection with its duties under 22subsection (3) of Section 18c-7401 of the Illinois Vehicle 23Code, with the remainder to be used by the Department of 24Transportation upon order of the Illinois Commerce Commission, 25to pay that part of the cost apportioned by such Commission to 26the State to cover the interest of the public in the use of   HB3581- 3 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1highways, roads, streets, or pedestrian walkways in the county 2highway system, township and district road system, or 3municipal street system as defined in the Illinois Highway 4Code, as the same may from time to time be amended, for 5separation of grades, for installation, construction or 6reconstruction of crossing protection or reconstruction, 7alteration, relocation including construction or improvement 8of any existing highway necessary for access to property or 9improvement of any grade crossing and grade crossing surface 10including the necessary highway approaches thereto of any 11railroad across the highway or public road, or for the 12installation, construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of 13safety treatments to deter trespassing or a pedestrian walkway 14over or under a railroad right-of-way, as provided for in and 15in accordance with Section 18c-7401 of the Illinois Vehicle 16Code. The Commission may order up to $2,000,000 per year in 17Grade Crossing Protection Fund moneys for the improvement of 18grade crossing surfaces and up to $300,000 per year for the 19maintenance and renewal of 4-quadrant gate vehicle detection 20systems located at non-high speed rail grade crossings. In 21entering orders for projects for which payments from the Grade 22Crossing Protection Fund will be made, the Commission shall 23account for expenditures authorized by the orders on a cash 24rather than an accrual basis. For purposes of this requirement 25an "accrual basis" assumes that the total cost of the project 26is expended in the fiscal year in which the order is entered,   HB3581- 4 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1while a "cash basis" allocates the cost of the project among 2fiscal years as expenditures are actually made. To meet the 3requirements of this subsection, the Illinois Commerce 4Commission shall develop annual and 5-year project plans of 5rail crossing capital improvements that will be paid for with 6moneys from the Grade Crossing Protection Fund. The annual 7project plan shall identify projects for the succeeding fiscal 8year and the 5-year project plan shall identify projects for 9the 5 directly succeeding fiscal years. The Commission shall 10submit the annual and 5-year project plans for this Fund to the 11Governor, the President of the Senate, the Senate Minority 12Leader, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the 13Minority Leader of the House of Representatives on the first 14Wednesday in April of each year;15    (d) of the amount remaining after allocations provided for 16in subsections (a), (a-1), (b), and (c), a sufficient amount 17shall be reserved to pay all of the following:18        (1) the costs of the Department of Revenue in 19    administering this Act;20        (2) the costs of the Department of Transportation in 21    performing its duties imposed by the Illinois Highway Code 22    for supervising the use of motor fuel tax funds 23    apportioned to municipalities, counties and road 24    districts;25        (3) refunds provided for in Section 13, refunds for 26    overpayment of decal fees paid under Section 13a.4 of this   HB3581- 5 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    Act, and refunds provided for under the terms of the 2    International Fuel Tax Agreement referenced in Section 3    14a;4        (4) from October 1, 1985 until June 30, 1994, the 5    administration of the Vehicle Emissions Inspection Law, 6    which amount shall be certified monthly by the 7    Environmental Protection Agency to the State Comptroller 8    and shall promptly be transferred by the State Comptroller 9    and Treasurer from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund to the Vehicle 10    Inspection Fund, and for the period July 1, 1994 through 11    June 30, 2000, one-twelfth of $25,000,000 each month, for 12    the period July 1, 2000 through June 30, 2003, one-twelfth 13    of $30,000,000 each month, and $15,000,000 on July 1, 14    2003, and $15,000,000 on January 1, 2004, and $15,000,000 15    on each July 1 and October 1, or as soon thereafter as may 16    be practical, during the period July 1, 2004 through June 17    30, 2012, and $30,000,000 on June 1, 2013, or as soon 18    thereafter as may be practical, and $15,000,000 on July 1 19    and October 1, or as soon thereafter as may be practical, 20    during the period of July 1, 2013 through June 30, 2015, 21    for the administration of the Vehicle Emissions Inspection 22    Law of 2005, to be transferred by the State Comptroller 23    and Treasurer from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund into the 24    Vehicle Inspection Fund;25        (4.5) beginning on July 1, 2019, the costs of the 26    Environmental Protection Agency for the administration of   HB3581- 6 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    the Vehicle Emissions Inspection Law of 2005 shall be 2    paid, subject to appropriation, from the Motor Fuel Tax 3    Fund into the Vehicle Inspection Fund; beginning in 2019, 4    no later than December 31 of each year, or as soon 5    thereafter as practical, the State Comptroller shall 6    direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer from the 7    Vehicle Inspection Fund to the Motor Fuel Tax Fund any 8    balance remaining in the Vehicle Inspection Fund in excess 9    of $2,000,000;10        (5) amounts ordered paid by the Court of Claims; and11        (6) payment of motor fuel use taxes due to member 12    jurisdictions under the terms of the International Fuel 13    Tax Agreement. The Department shall certify these amounts 14    to the Comptroller by the 15th day of each month; the 15    Comptroller shall cause orders to be drawn for such 16    amounts, and the Treasurer shall administer those amounts 17    on or before the last day of each month;18    (e) after allocations for the purposes set forth in 19subsections (a), (a-1), (b), (c), and (d), the remaining 20amount shall be apportioned as follows:21        (1) Until January 1, 2000, 58.4%, and beginning 22    January 1, 2000, 45.6% shall be deposited as follows:23            (A) 37% into the State Construction Account Fund, 24        and25            (B) 63% into the Road Fund, $1,250,000 of which 26        shall be reserved each month for the Department of   HB3581- 7 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1        Transportation to be used in accordance with the 2        provisions of Sections 6-901 through 6-906 of the 3        Illinois Highway Code;4        (2) Until January 1, 2000, 41.6%, and beginning 5    January 1, 2000, 54.4% shall be transferred to the 6    Department of Transportation to be distributed as follows:7            (A) 49.10% to the municipalities of the State,8            (B) 16.74% to the counties of the State having 9        1,000,000 or more inhabitants,10            (C) 18.27% to the counties of the State having 11        less than 1,000,000 inhabitants,12            (D) 15.89% to the road districts of the State.13        If a township is dissolved under Article 24 of the 14    Township Code, the county in which the township lies 15    McHenry County shall receive any moneys that would have 16    been distributed to the township under this subparagraph, 17    except that a municipality that assumes the powers and 18    responsibilities of a road district under paragraph (6) of 19    Section 24-35 of the Township Code shall receive any 20    moneys that would have been distributed to the township in 21    a percent equal to the area of the dissolved road district 22    or portion of the dissolved road district over which the 23    municipality assumed the powers and responsibilities 24    compared to the total area of the dissolved township. The 25    moneys received under this subparagraph shall be used in 26    the geographic area of the dissolved township. If a   HB3581- 8 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    township is reconstituted as provided under Section 24-45 2    of the Township Code, McHenry County or a municipality 3    shall no longer be distributed moneys under this 4    subparagraph.5    As soon as may be after the first day of each month, the 6Department of Transportation shall allot to each municipality 7its share of the amount apportioned to the several 8municipalities which shall be in proportion to the population 9of such municipalities as determined by the last preceding 10municipal census if conducted by the Federal Government or 11Federal census. If territory is annexed to any municipality 12subsequent to the time of the last preceding census the 13corporate authorities of such municipality may cause a census 14to be taken of such annexed territory and the population so 15ascertained for such territory shall be added to the 16population of the municipality as determined by the last 17preceding census for the purpose of determining the allotment 18for that municipality. If the population of any municipality 19was not determined by the last Federal census preceding any 20apportionment, the apportionment to such municipality shall be 21in accordance with any census taken by such municipality. Any 22municipal census used in accordance with this Section shall be 23certified to the Department of Transportation by the clerk of 24such municipality, and the accuracy thereof shall be subject 25to approval of the Department which may make such corrections 26as it ascertains to be necessary.  HB3581- 9 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    As soon as may be after the first day of each month, the 2Department of Transportation shall allot to each county its 3share of the amount apportioned to the several counties of the 4State as herein provided. Each allotment to the several 5counties having less than 1,000,000 inhabitants shall be in 6proportion to the amount of motor vehicle license fees 7received from the residents of such counties, respectively, 8during the preceding calendar year. The Secretary of State 9shall, on or before April 15 of each year, transmit to the 10Department of Transportation a full and complete report 11showing the amount of motor vehicle license fees received from 12the residents of each county, respectively, during the 13preceding calendar year. The Department of Transportation 14shall, each month, use for allotment purposes the last such 15report received from the Secretary of State.16    As soon as may be after the first day of each month, the 17Department of Transportation shall allot to the several 18counties their share of the amount apportioned for the use of 19road districts. The allotment shall be apportioned among the 20several counties in the State in the proportion which the 21total mileage of township or district roads in the respective 22counties bears to the total mileage of all township and 23district roads in the State. Funds allotted to the respective 24counties for the use of road districts therein shall be 25allocated to the several road districts in the county in the 26proportion which the total mileage of such township or   HB3581- 10 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1district roads in the respective road districts bears to the 2total mileage of all such township or district roads in the 3county. After July 1 of any year prior to 2011, no allocation 4shall be made for any road district unless it levied a tax for 5road and bridge purposes in an amount which will require the 6extension of such tax against the taxable property in any such 7road district at a rate of not less than either .08% of the 8value thereof, based upon the assessment for the year 9immediately prior to the year in which such tax was levied and 10as equalized by the Department of Revenue or, in DuPage 11County, an amount equal to or greater than $12,000 per mile of 12road under the jurisdiction of the road district, whichever is 13less. Beginning July 1, 2011 and each July 1 thereafter, an 14allocation shall be made for any road district if it levied a 15tax for road and bridge purposes. In counties other than 16DuPage County, if the amount of the tax levy requires the 17extension of the tax against the taxable property in the road 18district at a rate that is less than 0.08% of the value 19thereof, based upon the assessment for the year immediately 20prior to the year in which the tax was levied and as equalized 21by the Department of Revenue, then the amount of the 22allocation for that road district shall be a percentage of the 23maximum allocation equal to the percentage obtained by 24dividing the rate extended by the district by 0.08%. In DuPage 25County, if the amount of the tax levy requires the extension of 26the tax against the taxable property in the road district at a   HB3581- 11 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1rate that is less than the lesser of (i) 0.08% of the value of 2the taxable property in the road district, based upon the 3assessment for the year immediately prior to the year in which 4such tax was levied and as equalized by the Department of 5Revenue, or (ii) a rate that will yield an amount equal to 6$12,000 per mile of road under the jurisdiction of the road 7district, then the amount of the allocation for the road 8district shall be a percentage of the maximum allocation equal 9to the percentage obtained by dividing the rate extended by 10the district by the lesser of (i) 0.08% or (ii) the rate that 11will yield an amount equal to $12,000 per mile of road under 12the jurisdiction of the road district. 13    Prior to 2011, if any road district has levied a special 14tax for road purposes pursuant to Sections 6-601, 6-602, and 156-603 of the Illinois Highway Code, and such tax was levied in 16an amount which would require extension at a rate of not less 17than .08% of the value of the taxable property thereof, as 18equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue, or, in 19DuPage County, an amount equal to or greater than $12,000 per 20mile of road under the jurisdiction of the road district, 21whichever is less, such levy shall, however, be deemed a 22proper compliance with this Section and shall qualify such 23road district for an allotment under this Section. Beginning 24in 2011 and thereafter, if any road district has levied a 25special tax for road purposes under Sections 6-601, 6-602, and 266-603 of the Illinois Highway Code, and the tax was levied in   HB3581- 12 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1an amount that would require extension at a rate of not less 2than 0.08% of the value of the taxable property of that road 3district, as equalized or assessed by the Department of 4Revenue or, in DuPage County, an amount equal to or greater 5than $12,000 per mile of road under the jurisdiction of the 6road district, whichever is less, that levy shall be deemed a 7proper compliance with this Section and shall qualify such 8road district for a full, rather than proportionate, allotment 9under this Section. If the levy for the special tax is less 10than 0.08% of the value of the taxable property, or, in DuPage 11County if the levy for the special tax is less than the lesser 12of (i) 0.08% or (ii) $12,000 per mile of road under the 13jurisdiction of the road district, and if the levy for the 14special tax is more than any other levy for road and bridge 15purposes, then the levy for the special tax qualifies the road 16district for a proportionate, rather than full, allotment 17under this Section. If the levy for the special tax is equal to 18or less than any other levy for road and bridge purposes, then 19any allotment under this Section shall be determined by the 20other levy for road and bridge purposes.21    Prior to 2011, if a township has transferred to the road 22and bridge fund money which, when added to the amount of any 23tax levy of the road district would be the equivalent of a tax 24levy requiring extension at a rate of at least .08%, or, in 25DuPage County, an amount equal to or greater than $12,000 per 26mile of road under the jurisdiction of the road district,   HB3581- 13 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1whichever is less, such transfer, together with any such tax 2levy, shall be deemed a proper compliance with this Section 3and shall qualify the road district for an allotment under 4this Section.5    In counties in which a property tax extension limitation 6is imposed under the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law, 7road districts may retain their entitlement to a motor fuel 8tax allotment or, beginning in 2011, their entitlement to a 9full allotment if, at the time the property tax extension 10limitation was imposed, the road district was levying a road 11and bridge tax at a rate sufficient to entitle it to a motor 12fuel tax allotment and continues to levy the maximum allowable 13amount after the imposition of the property tax extension 14limitation. Any road district may in all circumstances retain 15its entitlement to a motor fuel tax allotment or, beginning in 162011, its entitlement to a full allotment if it levied a road 17and bridge tax in an amount that will require the extension of 18the tax against the taxable property in the road district at a 19rate of not less than 0.08% of the assessed value of the 20property, based upon the assessment for the year immediately 21preceding the year in which the tax was levied and as equalized 22by the Department of Revenue or, in DuPage County, an amount 23equal to or greater than $12,000 per mile of road under the 24jurisdiction of the road district, whichever is less.25    As used in this Section, the term "road district" means 26any road district, including a county unit road district,   HB3581- 14 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1provided for by the Illinois Highway Code; and the term 2"township or district road" means any road in the township and 3district road system as defined in the Illinois Highway Code. 4For the purposes of this Section, "township or district road" 5also includes such roads as are maintained by park districts, 6forest preserve districts and conservation districts. The 7Department of Transportation shall determine the mileage of 8all township and district roads for the purposes of making 9allotments and allocations of motor fuel tax funds for use in 10road districts.11    Payment of motor fuel tax moneys to municipalities and 12counties shall be made as soon as possible after the allotment 13is made. The treasurer of the municipality or county may 14invest these funds until their use is required and the 15interest earned by these investments shall be limited to the 16same uses as the principal funds.17(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 19    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing and 20renumbering Section 5-1185, as added by Public Act 101-230, as 21follows: 22    (55 ILCS 5/5-1185)23    Sec. 5-1185. Dissolution of townships in McHenry County. 24If a township in McHenry County dissolves as provided in   HB3581- 15 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1Article 24 of the Township Code, the county McHenry County 2shall assume the powers, duties, and obligations of each 3dissolved township as provided in Article 24 of the Township 4Code.5(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 6    Section 15. The Township Code is amended by changing the 7heading of Article 24 and Sections 24-10, 24-15, 24-20, 24-30, 8and 24-35 as follows: 9    (60 ILCS 1/Art. 24 heading)10ARTICLE 24. DISSOLUTION OF11TOWNSHIPS IN MCHENRY COUNTY 12(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.) 13    (60 ILCS 1/24-10)14    Sec. 24-10. Definition. As used in this Article, 15"electors" means the registered voters of any single township 16in a county under township organization McHenry County.17(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.) 18    (60 ILCS 1/24-15)19    Sec. 24-15. Dissolving a township in McHenry County. By 20resolution, the board of trustees of a any township located in 21McHenry County may submit a proposition to dissolve the 22township to the electors of that township at the election next   HB3581- 16 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1following in accordance with the general election law. The 2ballot shall be as provided for in Section 24-30.3(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.) 4    (60 ILCS 1/24-20)5    Sec. 24-20. Petition requirements; notice.6    (a) Subject to the petition requirements of Section 28-3 7of the Election Code, petitions for a referendum to dissolve a 8township located in McHenry County must be filed with the 9governing board of the township, the county board of McHenry 10County, and the county clerk McHenry County Clerk not less 11than 122 days prior to any election held throughout the 12township. Petitions must include: 13        (1) the name of the dissolving township; 14        (2) the date of dissolution; and 15        (3) signatures of a number of electors as follows: (A) 16    for any township, the number of signatures shall be the 17    larger of (i) 5% of the total ballots cast in the township 18    in the immediately preceding election that is of an 19    election type comparable to the election for which the 20    petition is being filed, or (ii) 250 signatures. All 21    signatures gathered under this paragraph (3) must be 22    signed within 180 days prior to the filing of a petition. 23    (b) The proposed date of dissolution shall be at least 90 24days after the date of the election at which the referendum is 25to be voted upon.   HB3581- 17 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    (c) If a valid petition is filed under subsection (a), 2then the county clerk McHenry County Clerk shall, by 3publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation 4within the county and on the county's website, not less than 90 5days prior to the election at which the referendum is to be 6voted on, give notice in substantially the following form: 7    NOTICE OF PETITION TO DISSOLVE (dissolving township). 8    Residents of (dissolving township) and (county) McHenry 9    County are notified that a petition has been filed with 10    (dissolving township) and (county) McHenry County 11    requesting a referendum to dissolve (dissolving township) 12    on (date of dissolution) with all real and personal 13    property, and any other assets, together with all 14    personnel, contractual obligations, and liabilities being 15    transferred to (county) McHenry County. 16(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.) 17    (60 ILCS 1/24-30)18    Sec. 24-30. Referendum; voting.19    (a) Subject to the requirements of Section 16-7 of the 20Election Code, the referendum described in Section 24-25 shall 21be in substantially the following form on the ballot:22-------- 23    Shall the (dissolving 24township), together with any road HB3581- 18 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1districts wholly within the                   YES 2boundaries of (dissolving 3township), be dissolved on (date          -------------- 4of dissolution) with all of 5the township and road district 6property, assets, personnel,                   NO 7obligations, and liabilities being 8transferred to (county) McHenry County? 9-------------------------------------------------------------10    (b) The referendum is approved when a majority of those 11voting in the election from the dissolving township approve 12the referendum. 13(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.) 14    (60 ILCS 1/24-35)15    Sec. 24-35. Dissolution; transfer of rights and duties. 16When the dissolution of a township has been approved under 17Section 24-30: 18        (1) On or before the date of dissolution, all real and 19    personal property, and any other assets, together with all 20    personnel, contractual obligations, and liabilities of the 21    dissolving township and road districts wholly within the 22    boundaries of the dissolving township shall be transferred 23    to the county McHenry County. All funds of the dissolved 24    township and dissolved road districts shall be used solely 25    on behalf of the residents of the geographic area within   HB3581- 19 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    the boundaries of the dissolved township.2        After the transfer of property to the county under 3    this paragraph, all park land, cemetery land, buildings, 4    and facilities within the geographic area of the 5    dissolving township must be utilized for the primary 6    benefit of the geographic area of the dissolving township. 7    Proceeds from the sale of the park land, cemetery land, 8    buildings, or facilities after transfer to the county must 9    be utilized for the sole benefit of the geographic area of 10    the dissolved township. 11        (2) On the date of dissolution, the dissolving 12    township is dissolved. 13        (3) On and after the date of dissolution, all rights 14    and duties of the dissolved township may be exercised by 15    the county board McHenry County Board solely on behalf of 16    the residents of the geographic area within the boundaries 17    of the dissolved township. The duties that may be 18    exercised by the county include, but are not limited to, 19    the administration of a dissolved township's general 20    assistance program, maintenance and operation of a 21    dissolved township's cemeteries, and the county assessor 22    or county supervisor of assessments Chief County 23    Assessment officer of McHenry County exercising the duties 24    of the township assessor.25        (4) The county board McHenry County Board shall not 26    extend a property tax levy that is greater than 90% of the   HB3581- 20 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    property tax levy extended by the dissolved township or 2    road districts for the duties taken on by the county 3    McHenry County. This property tax levy may not be extended 4    outside the boundaries of the dissolved township. In all 5    subsequent years, this levy shall be bound by the 6    provisions of the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law.7        A tax levy extended under this paragraph may be used 8    for the purposes allowed by the statute authorizing the 9    tax levy or to pay liabilities of the dissolved township 10    or dissolved road districts that were transferred to the 11    county under paragraph (1). The taxpayers within the 12    boundaries of the dissolved township are responsible to 13    pay any liabilities transferred to the county: the county 14    shall reduce spending within the boundaries of the former 15    township in the amount necessary to pay off any 16    liabilities transferred to the county under paragraph (1) 17    that are not covered by the assets enumerated in paragraph 18    (1) or taxes under this paragraph. 19        (5) All road districts wholly within the boundaries of 20    the dissolving township are dissolved on the date of 21    dissolution of the dissolving township, and all powers and 22    responsibilities of each road district are transferred to 23    the county McHenry County except as provided in paragraph 24    (6).25        (6) The county board of McHenry County shall give 26    written notice to each municipality whose governing board   HB3581- 21 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    meets within the boundaries of a dissolving township that 2    the municipality may make an offer, on or before 60 days 3    after the date of dissolution of the dissolving township, 4    that the municipality will assume all of the powers and 5    responsibilities of a road district or road districts 6    wholly inside the dissolving township. The notice shall be 7    sent to each municipality on or before 30 days after the 8    date of dissolution of the township. Any eligible 9    municipality may, with consent of its governing board, 10    make an offer to assume all of the powers and 11    responsibilities of the dissolving township's road 12    district or road districts. A municipality may offer to 13    assume the powers and responsibilities only for a limited 14    period of time. If one or more offers are received by the 15    county McHenry County on or before 60 days after the date 16    of dissolution of the dissolving township, the county 17    board of McHenry County shall select the best offer or 18    offers that the board determines would be in the best 19    interest and welfare of the affected resident population. 20    If no municipality makes an offer or if no satisfactory 21    offer is made, the powers and duties of the dissolving 22    township's road district or road districts are retained by 23    the county McHenry County. The municipality that assumes 24    the powers and duties of the dissolving township's road 25    district or road districts shall not extend a road 26    district property tax levy under Division 5 of Article 6   HB3581- 22 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1    of the Illinois Highway Code that is greater than 90% of 2    the road district property tax levy that was extended by 3    the county on behalf of the dissolving township's road 4    district or road districts for the duties taken on by the 5    municipality.6        (7) On the date of dissolution of the township or road 7    district, elected and appointed township officers and road 8    commissioners shall cease to hold office. An elected or 9    appointed township official or township road commissioner 10    shall not be compensated for any other duties performed 11    after the dissolution of the township or road district 12    that they represented. An elected township official or 13    township road commissioner shall not have legal recourse 14    relating to the ceasing of their elected or appointed 15    positions upon the ceasing of their position.16(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.) 17    Section 20. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 18changing Section 6-140 as follows: 19    (605 ILCS 5/6-140)20    Sec. 6-140. Abolishing a township road district within 21Lake County or McHenry County with less than 15 miles of roads. 22A Any township in Lake County or McHenry County shall abolish a 23road district of that township if the roads of the road 24district are less than 15 centerline miles in length, as   HB3581- 23 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1determined by the county engineer or county superintendent of 2highways. A road district is abolished on the expiration of 3the term of office of the highway commissioner of the road 4district facing abolition following the determination by the 5county engineer or county superintendent of highways of the 6length, in centerline mileage, of the roads within the road 7district to be abolished.8    On the date of abolition: all the rights, powers, duties, 9assets, property, liabilities, obligations, and 10responsibilities of the road district shall by operation of 11law vest in and be assumed by the township; the township board 12of trustees shall assume all taxing authority of a road 13district abolished under this Section and shall exercise all 14duties and responsibilities of the highway commissioner as 15provided in this Code; and for purposes of distribution of 16revenue, the township shall assume the powers, duties, and 17obligations of the road district. The township board of 18trustees may enter into a contract with the county, a 19municipality, or a private contractor to administer the roads 20added to its jurisdiction under this Section.21(Source: P.A. 101-230, eff. 8-9-19.) 22    (605 ILCS 5/6-135 rep.)23    Section 25. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 24repealing Section 6-135. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB3581- 24 -LRB104 06161 RTM 16195 b1becoming law.